New York, session 2025-2026, S8242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 27.15 of the parks, recreation and 2 historic preservation law, as amended by chapter 341 of the laws of 3 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. The amount of state aid to be allocated to counties, cities, towns 5 or villages shall be determined by the commissioner as hereinafter 6 provided. The commissioner shall determine the percentage proportion 7 which the authorized expenditures of each individual county, city, town 8 or village, but not exceeding fifty thousand dollars for each county 9 including the municipalities therein, shall bear to the total authorized 10 expenditures of all the counties, cities, towns or villages for enforce- 11 ment of such provisions during the fiscal year. Such percentage propor- 12 tion shall then be applied against an amount equal to twenty-five 13 percent of the amount received by the state in fees received for regis- 14 tration of snowmobiles during such fiscal year, to the extent only and 15 not exceeding the sum of [two] three hundred thousand dollars. The 16 amount thus determined shall constitute the maximum amount of state aid 17 to which each county, city, town or village shall be entitled. Provided, 18 however, that no county, city, town or village shall receive state aid 19 in an amount in excess of three-quarters of its authorized expenditures 20 as approved by the commissioner for such fiscal year. The commissioner 21 shall certify to the comptroller the amount thus determined for each 22 county, city, town or village as the amount of state aid to be appor- 23 tioned to such county, city, town or village. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09985-01-5